District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.05

Rebate agreement.

A drug manufacturer or labeler that sells prescription drugs in the District through any publicly funded pharmaceutical assistance program shall enter into a rebate agreement with the Department under AccessRx. The rebate agreement shall require the manufacturer or labeler to make rebate payments to the District for deposit in the AccessRx Fund each calendar quarter or according to a schedule established by the Department.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 105, 51 DCR 3688
This section is referenced in § 48-831.33.